District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.103

Certain representations prohibited.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person who is not licensed as an interior designer to engage in the practice of interior design, to advertise as an interior designer, to use the title of “interior designer” or any other words, letters, figures, or other device for the purpose of implying, directly or indirectly, that the person is an interior designer.

(b)

No company, partnership, association, corporation, or other similar organization shall use the title of “interior designer” unless interior design services rendered by or on behalf of the organization are in the responsible charge of a licensed interior designer.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.103.

Prior Codifications